Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4842.01
Claims allowed under separate account policies, contracts, or agreements; how treated.

(1) Every claim allowed under a separate account policy, contract, or agreement providing, in effect, that the assets allocated to the separate account are not chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business of the life insurer, shall be satisfied out of the assets properly allocated to and maintained in the separate account, equal to the reserves maintained in the separate account for the policies, contracts, or agreements. No liabilities of the insurer arising out of any other business of the insurer shall be satisfied from assets properly allocated to and maintained in a separate account except from any assets allocated to the separate account that exceed the reserves under the separate account policies, contracts, or agreements. Any valid and allowed claim for contractual benefits that cannot be satisfied out of the assets properly allocated to and maintained in a separate account shall be included as a claim against the general account as set forth in subdivision (2) of section 44-4842.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent that any assets of a life insurer, other than those assets properly allocated to, and maintained in, a separate account, have been used to fund or pay any expenses, taxes, or policyholder benefits that are attributable to a separate account policy, contract, or agreement that should have been paid by a separate account prior to the commencement of delinquency proceedings, then upon the commencement of delinquency proceedings, the separate accounts that benefited from this payment or funding shall first be used to repay or reimburse the insurer's general assets or account for any unreimbursed net sums due at the commencement of delinquency proceedings prior to the application of the separate account assets to the satisfaction of liabilities of the corresponding separate account policies, contracts, and agreements.

(3) For purposes of this section, separate account policies, contracts, or agreements means any policies, contracts, or agreements that provide for separate accounts as contemplated by sections 44-402.01 to 44-402.05 or section 44-708.

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 16.